Utah statutes.
10-7-16.   Call for bids -- Notice -- Contents.
(1) (a)  Before holding an election under Subsection 10-7-15(1)(a)(ii), the
municipal legislative body shall open to bid the sale or lease of the property
mentioned in Section 10-7-15.
(b)  The municipal legislative body shall cause notice of the bid process to
be given by publication for at least three consecutive weeks:
(i)  in a newspaper published or having general circulation in the city or
town; and
(ii)  as required in Section 45-1-101.
(c)  The notice described in Subsection (1) shall:
(i)  give a general description of the property to be sold or leased;
(ii)  specify the time when sealed bids for the property, or for a lease on
the property, will be received; and
(iii)  specify the time when and the place where the bids will be opened.
(2) (a)  As used in this section and in Section 10-7-17, "responsible bidder"
means an entity with a proven history of successful operation of an electrical
generation and distribution system, or an equivalent proven history.
(b)  Subject to Subsection (2)(c), a municipal legislative body may receive or
refuse to receive any bid submitted for the sale or lease of the electrical
works and plant.
(c)  A municipal legislative body may not receive a bid unless the municipal
legislative body determines that the bid is submitted by a responsible bidder.
